Illinois, session 104th, SB3288.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Insurance Code is amended by 5changing Section 356z.3a as follows: 6    (215 ILCS 5/356z.3a)7    (Text of Section before amendment by P.A. 104-60)8    Sec. 356z.3a. Billing; emergency services; 9nonparticipating providers.10    (a) As used in this Section:11    "Ancillary services" means:12        (1) items and services related to emergency medicine, 13    anesthesiology, pathology, radiology, and neonatology that 14    are provided by any health care provider;15        (2) items and services provided by assistant surgeons, 16    hospitalists, and intensivists;17        (3) diagnostic services, including radiology and 18    laboratory services, except for advanced diagnostic 19    laboratory tests identified on the most current list 20    published by the United States Secretary of Health and 21    Human Services under 42 U.S.C. 300gg-132(b)(3);22        (4) items and services provided by other specialty 23    practitioners as the United States Secretary of Health and   SB3288- 2 -LRB104 16103 BAB 29407 b1    Human Services specifies through rulemaking under 42 2    U.S.C. 300gg-132(b)(3);3        (5) items and services provided by a nonparticipating 4    provider if there is no participating provider who can 5    furnish the item or service at the facility; and6        (6) items and services provided by a nonparticipating 7    provider if there is no participating provider who will 8    furnish the item or service because a participating 9    provider has asserted the participating provider's rights 10    under the Health Care Right of Conscience Act. 11    "Average gross charge rate" means, with respect to 12nonparticipating ground ambulance service providers, the 13average of the provider's gross charge rates in place for each 14individual charge described in subsection (b-15) of this 15Section for dates of service that fall within the 12-month 16period ending on June 30 immediately preceding the date on 17which the reporting of average gross charge rates is required. 18    "Cost sharing" means the amount an insured, beneficiary, 19or enrollee is responsible for paying for a covered item or 20service under the terms of the policy or certificate. "Cost 21sharing" includes copayments, coinsurance, and amounts paid 22toward deductibles, but does not include amounts paid towards 23premiums, balance billing by out-of-network providers, or the 24cost of items or services that are not covered under the policy 25or certificate.26    "Emergency department of a hospital" means any hospital   SB3288- 3 -LRB104 16103 BAB 29407 b1department that provides emergency services, including a 2hospital outpatient department.3    "Emergency medical condition" has the meaning ascribed to 4that term in Section 10 of the Managed Care Reform and Patient 5Rights Act.6    "Emergency medical screening examination" has the meaning 7ascribed to that term in Section 10 of the Managed Care Reform 8and Patient Rights Act.9    "Emergency services" means, with respect to an emergency 10medical condition:11        (1) in general, an emergency medical screening 12    examination, including ancillary services routinely 13    available to the emergency department to evaluate such 14    emergency medical condition, and such further medical 15    examination and treatment as would be required to 16    stabilize the patient regardless of the department of the 17    hospital or other facility in which such further 18    examination or treatment is furnished; or19        (2) additional items and services for which benefits 20    are provided or covered under the coverage and that are 21    furnished by a nonparticipating provider or 22    nonparticipating emergency facility regardless of the 23    department of the hospital or other facility in which such 24    items are furnished after the insured, beneficiary, or 25    enrollee is stabilized and as part of outpatient 26    observation or an inpatient or outpatient stay with   SB3288- 4 -LRB104 16103 BAB 29407 b1    respect to the visit in which the services described in 2    paragraph (1) are furnished. Services after stabilization 3    cease to be emergency services only when all the 4    conditions of 42 U.S.C. 300gg-111(a)(3)(C)(ii)(II) and 5    regulations thereunder are met.6    "Emergency ground ambulance service" means ground 7ambulance service provided by ground ambulance service 8providers, regardless of whether the patient was transported, 9if the service was provided pursuant to a request to 9-1-1 or 10an equivalent telephone number, texting system, or other 11method of summoning emergency service or if the service 12provided was provided when a patient's condition, at the time 13of service, was considered to be an emergency medical 14condition as determined by a physician licensed under the 15Medical Practice Act of 1987. 16    "Evaluation" means, with respect to emergency ground 17ambulance service, the provision of a medical screening 18examination to determine whether an emergency medical 19condition exists. 20    "Freestanding Emergency Center" means a facility licensed 21under Section 32.5 of the Emergency Medical Services (EMS) 22Systems Act.23    "Ground ambulance service" means both medical 24transportation service that is described as ground ambulance 25service by the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services and 26medical nontransportation service, such as evaluation without   SB3288- 5 -LRB104 16103 BAB 29407 b1transport, treatment without transport, or paramedic 2intercept, and that is, in either case, provided in a vehicle 3that is licensed as an ambulance under the Emergency Medical 4Services (EMS) Systems Act or by EMS Personnel assigned to a 5vehicle that is licensed as an ambulance under the Emergency 6Medical Services (EMS) Systems Act. "Ground ambulance service" 7may include any combination of the following: emergency ground 8ambulance service in a ground ambulance, urgent ground 9ambulance service, evaluation without treatment, treatment 10without transport, and paramedic intercept.11    "Ground ambulance service provider" means a vehicle 12service provider under the Emergency Medical Services (EMS) 13Systems Act that operates licensed ground ambulances for the 14purpose of providing emergency ground ambulance services, 15urgent ground ambulances services, or both. "Ground ambulance 16service provider" includes both ambulance providers and 17ambulance suppliers as described by the Centers for Medicare 18and Medicaid Services. 19    "Health care facility" means, in the context of 20non-emergency services, any of the following:21        (1) a hospital as defined in 42 U.S.C. 1395x(e);22        (2) a hospital outpatient department;23        (3) a critical access hospital certified under 42 24    U.S.C. 1395i-4(e);25        (4) an ambulatory surgical treatment center as defined 26    in the Ambulatory Surgical Treatment Center Act; or  SB3288- 6 -LRB104 16103 BAB 29407 b1        (5) any recipient of a license under the Hospital 2    Licensing Act that is not otherwise described in this 3    definition.4    "Health care provider" means a provider as defined in 5subsection (d) of Section 370g. "Health care provider" does 6not include a provider of air ambulance or ground ambulance 7services.8    "Health care services" has the meaning ascribed to that 9term in subsection (a) of Section 370g.10    "Health insurance issuer" has the meaning ascribed to that 11term in Section 5 of the Illinois Health Insurance Portability 12and Accountability Act.13    "Nonparticipating emergency facility" means, with respect 14to the furnishing of an item or service under a policy of group 15or individual health insurance coverage, any of the following 16facilities that does not have a contractual relationship 17directly or indirectly with a health insurance issuer in 18relation to the coverage:19        (1) an emergency department of a hospital;20        (2) a Freestanding Emergency Center;21        (3) an ambulatory surgical treatment center as defined 22    in the Ambulatory Surgical Treatment Center Act; or23        (4) with respect to emergency services described in 24    paragraph (2) of the definition of "emergency services", a 25    hospital.26    "Nonparticipating ground ambulance service provider"   SB3288- 7 -LRB104 16103 BAB 29407 b1means, with respect to the furnishing of an item or services 2under a policy of group or individual health insurance 3coverage, any ground ambulance service provider that does not 4have a contractual relationship directly or indirectly with a 5health insurance issuer in relation to the coverage. 6    "Nonparticipating provider" means, with respect to the 7furnishing of an item or service under a policy of group or 8individual health insurance coverage, any health care provider 9who does not have a contractual relationship directly or 10indirectly with a health insurance issuer in relation to the 11coverage.12    "Paramedic intercept" means a service in which a ground 13ambulance staffed by licensed paramedics rendezvouses with a 14ground ambulance staffed with nonparamedics to provide 15advanced life support care. As used in this definition, 16"advanced life support care" means life support care that is 17warranted when a patient's condition and need for treatment 18exceed the basic life support or intermediate life support 19level of care. 20    "Participating emergency facility" means any of the 21following facilities that has a contractual relationship 22directly or indirectly with a health insurance issuer offering 23group or individual health insurance coverage setting forth 24the terms and conditions on which a relevant health care 25service is provided to an insured, beneficiary, or enrollee 26under the coverage:  SB3288- 8 -LRB104 16103 BAB 29407 b1        (1) an emergency department of a hospital;2        (2) a Freestanding Emergency Center;3        (3) an ambulatory surgical treatment center as defined 4    in the Ambulatory Surgical Treatment Center Act; or5        (4) with respect to emergency services described in 6    paragraph (2) of the definition of "emergency services", a 7    hospital.8    For purposes of this definition, a single case agreement 9between an emergency facility and an issuer that is used to 10address unique situations in which an insured, beneficiary, or 11enrollee requires services that typically occur out-of-network 12constitutes a contractual relationship and is limited to the 13parties to the agreement.14    "Participating ground ambulance service provider" means 15any ground ambulance service provider that has a contractual 16relationship directly or indirectly with a health insurance 17issuer offering group or individual health insurance coverage 18setting forth the terms and conditions on which a relevant 19health care service is provided to an insured, beneficiary, or 20enrollee under the coverage. As used in this definition, a 21single case agreement between a ground ambulance service 22provider and a health insurance issuer that is used to address 23unique situations in which an insured, beneficiary, or 24enrollee requires services that typically occur out-of-network 25constitutes a contractual relationship and is limited to the 26parties of the agreement.   SB3288- 9 -LRB104 16103 BAB 29407 b1    "Participating health care facility" means any health care 2facility that has a contractual relationship directly or 3indirectly with a health insurance issuer offering group or 4individual health insurance coverage setting forth the terms 5and conditions on which a relevant health care service is 6provided to an insured, beneficiary, or enrollee under the 7coverage. A single case agreement between an emergency 8facility and an issuer that is used to address unique 9situations in which an insured, beneficiary, or enrollee 10requires services that typically occur out-of-network 11constitutes a contractual relationship for purposes of this 12definition and is limited to the parties to the agreement.13    "Participating provider" means any health care provider 14that has a contractual relationship directly or indirectly 15with a health insurance issuer offering group or individual 16health insurance coverage setting forth the terms and 17conditions on which a relevant health care service is provided 18to an insured, beneficiary, or enrollee under the coverage.19    "Qualifying payment amount" has the meaning given to that 20term in 42 U.S.C. 300gg-111(a)(3)(E) and the regulations 21promulgated thereunder.22    "Recognized amount" means, except as otherwise provided in 23this Section, the lesser of the amount initially billed by the 24provider or the qualifying payment amount.25    "Stabilize" means "stabilization" as defined in Section 10 26of the Managed Care Reform and Patient Rights Act.  SB3288- 10 -LRB104 16103 BAB 29407 b1    "Treating provider" means a health care provider who has 2evaluated the individual.3    "Treatment" means, with respect to the provision of 4emergency ground ambulance service, the provision of an 5evaluation and either (i) a therapy or therapeutic agent used 6to treat an emergency medical condition or (ii) a procedure 7used to treat an emergency medical condition.8    "Urgent ground ambulance service" means ground ambulance 9service that is deemed medically necessary by a health care 10professional and is required within 12 hours after the 11certification of the need for the service. 12    "Visit" means, with respect to health care services 13furnished to an individual at a health care facility, health 14care services furnished by a provider at the facility, as well 15as equipment, devices, telehealth services, imaging services, 16laboratory services, and preoperative and postoperative 17services regardless of whether the provider furnishing such 18services is at the facility. 19    (b) Emergency services. When a beneficiary, insured, or 20enrollee receives emergency services from a nonparticipating 21provider or a nonparticipating emergency facility, the health 22insurance issuer shall ensure that the beneficiary, insured, 23or enrollee shall incur no greater out-of-pocket costs than 24the beneficiary, insured, or enrollee would have incurred with 25a participating provider or a participating emergency 26facility. Any cost-sharing requirements shall be applied as   SB3288- 11 -LRB104 16103 BAB 29407 b1though the emergency services had been received from a 2participating provider or a participating facility. Cost 3sharing shall be calculated based on the recognized amount for 4the emergency services. If the cost sharing for the same item 5or service furnished by a participating provider would have 6been a flat-dollar copayment, that amount shall be the 7cost-sharing amount unless the provider has billed a lesser 8total amount. In no event shall the beneficiary, insured, 9enrollee, or any group policyholder or plan sponsor be liable 10to or billed by the health insurance issuer, the 11nonparticipating provider, or the nonparticipating emergency 12facility for any amount beyond the cost sharing calculated in 13accordance with this subsection with respect to the emergency 14services delivered. Administrative requirements or limitations 15shall be no greater than those applicable to emergency 16services received from a participating provider or a 17participating emergency facility. 18    (b-5) Non-emergency services at participating health care 19facilities. 20        (1) When a beneficiary, insured, or enrollee utilizes 21    a participating health care facility and, due to any 22    reason, covered ancillary services are provided by a 23    nonparticipating provider during or resulting from the 24    visit, the health insurance issuer shall ensure that the 25    beneficiary, insured, or enrollee shall incur no greater 26    out-of-pocket costs than the beneficiary, insured, or   SB3288- 12 -LRB104 16103 BAB 29407 b1    enrollee would have incurred with a participating provider 2    for the ancillary services. Any cost-sharing requirements 3    shall be applied as though the ancillary services had been 4    received from a participating provider. Cost sharing shall 5    be calculated based on the recognized amount for the 6    ancillary services. If the cost sharing for the same item 7    or service furnished by a participating provider would 8    have been a flat-dollar copayment, that amount shall be 9    the cost-sharing amount unless the provider has billed a 10    lesser total amount. In no event shall the beneficiary, 11    insured, enrollee, or any group policyholder or plan 12    sponsor be liable to or billed by the health insurance 13    issuer, the nonparticipating provider, or the 14    participating health care facility for any amount beyond 15    the cost sharing calculated in accordance with this 16    subsection with respect to the ancillary services 17    delivered. In addition to ancillary services, the 18    requirements of this paragraph shall also apply with 19    respect to covered items or services furnished as a result 20    of unforeseen, urgent medical needs that arise at the time 21    an item or service is furnished, regardless of whether the 22    nonparticipating provider satisfied the notice and consent 23    criteria under paragraph (2) of this subsection. 24        (2) When a beneficiary, insured, or enrollee utilizes 25    a participating health care facility and receives 26    non-emergency covered health care services other than   SB3288- 13 -LRB104 16103 BAB 29407 b1    those described in paragraph (1) of this subsection from a 2    nonparticipating provider during or resulting from the 3    visit, the health insurance issuer shall ensure that the 4    beneficiary, insured, or enrollee incurs no greater 5    out-of-pocket costs than the beneficiary, insured, or 6    enrollee would have incurred with a participating provider 7    unless the nonparticipating provider or the participating 8    health care facility on behalf of the nonparticipating 9    provider satisfies the notice and consent criteria 10    provided in 42 U.S.C. 300gg-132 and regulations 11    promulgated thereunder. If the notice and consent criteria 12    are not satisfied, then:13            (A) any cost-sharing requirements shall be applied 14        as though the health care services had been received 15        from a participating provider;16            (B) cost sharing shall be calculated based on the 17        recognized amount for the health care services; and18            (C) in no event shall the beneficiary, insured, 19        enrollee, or any group policyholder or plan sponsor be 20        liable to or billed by the health insurance issuer, 21        the nonparticipating provider, or the participating 22        health care facility for any amount beyond the cost 23        sharing calculated in accordance with this subsection 24        with respect to the health care services delivered. 25    (b-10) Coverage for ground ambulance services provided by 26nonparticipating ground ambulance service providers.  SB3288- 14 -LRB104 16103 BAB 29407 b1        (1) Any group or individual policy of accident and 2    health insurance amended, delivered, issued, or renewed on 3    or after January 1, 2027 shall provide coverage for both 4    emergency ground ambulance service and urgent ground 5    ambulance service. 6        (2) Beginning on January 1, 2027, when a beneficiary, 7    insured, or enrollee receives emergency ground ambulance 8    services or urgent ambulance services from a 9    nonparticipating ground ambulance service provider, the 10    health insurance issuer shall ensure that the beneficiary, 11    insured, or enrollee shall incur no greater out-of-pocket 12    costs than the beneficiary, insured, or enrollee would 13    have incurred with a participating ground ambulance 14    provider. Any cost-sharing requirements shall be applied 15    as though the emergency ground ambulance services or 16    urgent ground ambulance services had been received from a 17    participating ground ambulance service provider. Except as 18    otherwise provided in State or federal law, cost sharing 19    shall be calculated based on the lesser of the policy's 20    copayment or coinsurance for an emergency room visit or 21    10% of the recognized amount. For purposes of this 22    subsection, the recognized amount shall be calculated as 23    provided for in paragraph (3) of this subsection. Except 24    as otherwise provided for in State or federal law, if the 25    cost sharing for the same item or service furnished by a 26    participating ground ambulance provider would have been a   SB3288- 15 -LRB104 16103 BAB 29407 b1    flat-dollar copayment, that amount shall be the 2    cost-sharing amount unless the nonparticipating ground 3    ambulance provider has billed a lesser total amount. 4        (3) Upon reasonable demand by a nonparticipating 5    ground ambulance service provider and after subtracting 6    the beneficiary's, insured's, or enrollee's cost sharing 7    amount, a health insurance issuer shall pay the 8    nonparticipating ground ambulance service provider as 9    follows: 10            (A) for nonparticipating ground ambulance service 11        providers subject to a unit of local government that 12        has jurisdiction over where the service was provided, 13        a rate that is equal to the rate established or 14        approved by the governing body of the local government 15        providing ground ambulance service having jurisdiction 16        for that area or subarea; or17            (B) for nonparticipating ground ambulance service 18        providers that are not subject to the jurisdiction of 19        a unit of local government, a rate that is equal to the 20        lesser of (i) the negotiated rate between the 21        nonparticipating ground ambulance service provider and 22        the health insurance issuer; (ii) 85% of the 23        nonparticipating ground ambulance service provider's 24        billed charges; or (iii) the average gross charge rate 25        in effect for the date of service in question for a 26        base charge and, if applicable, a loaded mileage   SB3288- 16 -LRB104 16103 BAB 29407 b1        charge, the nonparticipating ground ambulance service 2        provider has filed with the Department of Public 3        Health in accordance with subsection (b-15). 4            By accepting the payment from the health insurance 5        issuer, the nonparticipating ground ambulance service 6        provider shall not seek any payment from the 7        beneficiary, insured, or enrollee for any amount that 8        exceeds the deductible, coinsurance, or copay for 9        services provided to the beneficiary, insured, or 10        enrollee. 11    (b-15) Beginning on October 1, 2026, and each October 1 12thereafter, each nonparticipating ground ambulance service 13provider shall file annually with the Department of Public 14Health, in the form and manner prescribed by the Department of 15Public Health, its average gross charge rates and any other 16information required by the Department of Public Health, by 17rule, for each of the following ground ambulance charge 18descriptions, as applicable: (1) basic life support, urgent 19base; (2) basic life support, emergency base; (3) advanced 20life support, urgent, level 1 base; (4) advanced life support, 21emergency, level 1 base; (5) advanced life support, emergency, 22level 2 base; (6) specialty care transport base; (7) emergency 23response, evaluation without transport base; (8) emergency 24response, treatment without transport base; (9) emergency 25response, paramedic intercept base; and (10) loaded mileage, 26per loaded mile charge for each of the applicable base charge   SB3288- 17 -LRB104 16103 BAB 29407 b1descriptions services. The Department of Public Health shall 2publish the submitted rate information by January 1, 2027 and 3every January 1 thereafter. The Department of Public Health 4may request information from ground ambulance service 5providers and health insurance issuers regarding factors 6contributing to the network status of the ground ambulance 7service providers. The Department of Public Health may, upon 8the submission of rate information, assess a fee to each 9ground ambulance service provider that shall not exceed the 10administrative costs to complete the Department of Public 11Health's obligations in this subsection. The Department of 12Public Health may also request information from nationally 13recognized organizations that provide data on health care 14costs. The Department of Insurance shall direct the health 15insurance issuer to the location in which the information 16reported to the Department of Public Health is stored. 17    (c) Notwithstanding any other provision of this Code, 18except when the notice and consent criteria are satisfied for 19the situation in paragraph (2) of subsection (b-5), any 20benefits a beneficiary, insured, or enrollee receives for 21services under the situations in subsection (b), (b-5), 22(b-10), or (b-15) are assigned to the nonparticipating 23providers, nonparticipating ground ambulance service provider, 24or the facility acting on their behalf. Upon receipt of the 25provider's bill or facility's bill, the health insurance 26issuer shall provide the nonparticipating provider,   SB3288- 18 -LRB104 16103 BAB 29407 b1nonparticipating ground ambulance service provider, or the 2facility with a written explanation of benefits that specifies 3the proposed reimbursement and the applicable deductible, 4copayment, or coinsurance amounts owed by the insured, 5beneficiary, or enrollee. The health insurance issuer shall 6pay any reimbursement subject to this Section directly to the 7nonparticipating provider, nonparticipating ground ambulance 8service provider, or the facility.9    (d) For bills assigned under subsection (c), the 10nonparticipating provider or the facility may bill the health 11insurance issuer for the services rendered, and the health 12insurance issuer may pay the billed amount or attempt to 13negotiate reimbursement with the nonparticipating provider or 14the facility. Within 30 calendar days after the provider or 15facility transmits the bill to the health insurance issuer, 16the issuer shall send an initial payment or notice of denial of 17payment with the written explanation of benefits to the 18provider or facility. If attempts to negotiate reimbursement 19for services provided by a nonparticipating provider do not 20result in a resolution of the payment dispute within 30 days 21after receipt of written explanation of benefits by the health 22insurance issuer, then the health insurance issuer or 23nonparticipating provider or the facility may initiate binding 24arbitration to determine payment for services provided on a 25per-bill or batched-bill basis, in accordance with Section 26300gg-111 of the Public Health Service Act and the regulations   SB3288- 19 -LRB104 16103 BAB 29407 b1promulgated thereunder. The party requesting arbitration shall 2notify the other party arbitration has been initiated and 3state its final offer before arbitration. In response to this 4notice, the nonrequesting party shall inform the requesting 5party of its final offer before the arbitration occurs. 6Arbitration shall be initiated by filing a request with the 7Department of Insurance.8    (e) The Department of Insurance shall publish a list of 9approved arbitrators or entities that shall provide binding 10arbitration. These arbitrators shall be American Arbitration 11Association or American Health Lawyers Association trained 12arbitrators. Both parties must agree on an arbitrator from the 13Department of Insurance's or its approved entity's list of 14arbitrators. If no agreement can be reached, then a list of 5 15arbitrators shall be provided by the Department of Insurance 16or the approved entity. From the list of 5 arbitrators, the 17health insurance issuer can veto 2 arbitrators and the 18provider or facility can veto 2 arbitrators. The remaining 19arbitrator shall be the chosen arbitrator. This arbitration 20shall consist of a review of the written submissions by both 21parties. The arbitrator shall not establish a rebuttable 22presumption that the qualifying payment amount should be the 23total amount owed to the provider or facility by the 24combination of the issuer and the insured, beneficiary, or 25enrollee. Binding arbitration shall provide for a written 26decision within 45 days after the request is filed with the   SB3288- 20 -LRB104 16103 BAB 29407 b1Department of Insurance. Both parties shall be bound by the 2arbitrator's decision. The arbitrator's expenses and fees, 3together with other expenses, not including attorney's fees, 4incurred in the conduct of the arbitration, shall be paid as 5provided in the decision.6    (f) (Blank).7    (g) Section 368a of this Code Act shall not apply during 8the pendency of a decision under subsection (d). Upon the 9issuance of the arbitrator's decision, Section 368a applies 10with respect to the amount, if any, by which the arbitrator's 11determination exceeds the issuer's initial payment under 12subsection (c), or the entire amount of the arbitrator's 13determination if initial payment was denied. Any interest 14required to be paid to a provider under Section 368a shall not 15accrue until after 30 days of an arbitrator's decision as 16provided in subsection (d), but in no circumstances longer 17than 150 days from the date the nonparticipating 18facility-based provider billed for services rendered.19    (h) Nothing in this Section shall be interpreted to change 20the prudent layperson provisions with respect to emergency 21services under the Managed Care Reform and Patient Rights Act. 22    (i) Nothing in this Section shall preclude a health care 23provider from billing a beneficiary, insured, or enrollee for 24reasonable administrative fees, such as service fees for 25checks returned for nonsufficient funds and missed 26appointments.  SB3288- 21 -LRB104 16103 BAB 29407 b1    (j) Nothing in this Section shall preclude a beneficiary, 2insured, or enrollee from assigning benefits to a 3nonparticipating provider when the notice and consent criteria 4are satisfied under paragraph (2) of subsection (b-5) or in 5any other situation not described in subsection (b) or (b-5).6    (k) Except when the notice and consent criteria are 7satisfied under paragraph (2) of subsection (b-5), if an 8individual receives health care services under the situations 9described in subsection (b) or (b-5), no referral requirement 10or any other provision contained in the policy or certificate 11of coverage shall deny coverage, reduce benefits, or otherwise 12defeat the requirements of this Section for services that 13would have been covered with a participating provider. 14However, this subsection shall not be construed to preclude a 15provider contract with a health insurance issuer, or with an 16administrator or similar entity acting on the issuer's behalf, 17from imposing requirements on the participating provider, 18participating emergency facility, or participating health care 19facility relating to the referral of covered individuals to 20nonparticipating providers.21    (l) Except if the notice and consent criteria are 22satisfied under paragraph (2) of subsection (b-5), 23cost-sharing amounts calculated in conformity with this 24Section shall count toward any deductible or out-of-pocket 25maximum applicable to in-network coverage.26    (m) The Department has the authority to enforce the   SB3288- 22 -LRB104 16103 BAB 29407 b1requirements of this Section in the situations described in 2subsections (b) and (b-5), and in any other situation for 3which 42 U.S.C. Chapter 6A, Subchapter XXV, Parts D or E and 4regulations promulgated thereunder would prohibit an 5individual from being billed or liable for emergency services 6furnished by a nonparticipating provider or nonparticipating 7emergency facility or for non-emergency health care services 8furnished by a nonparticipating provider at a participating 9health care facility.10    (n) This Section does not apply with respect to air 11ambulance services. This Section does not apply to any policy 12of excepted benefits or to short-term, limited-duration health 13insurance coverage. 14    (o) A home rule unit may not regulate payments for ground 15ambulance service in a manner inconsistent with this Section. 16This subsection is a limitation under subsection (i) of 17Section 6 of Article VII of the Illinois Constitution on the 18concurrent exercise by home rule units of powers and functions 19exercised by the State. 20(Source: P.A. 103-440, eff. 1-1-24; 104-248, eff. 8-15-25; 21revised 9-12-25.) 22    (Text of Section after amendment by P.A. 104-60)23    Sec. 356z.3a. Billing; emergency services; 24nonparticipating providers.25    (a) As used in this Section:  SB3288- 23 -LRB104 16103 BAB 29407 b1    "Ancillary services" means:2        (1) items and services related to emergency medicine, 3    anesthesiology, pathology, radiology, and neonatology that 4    are provided by any health care provider;5        (2) items and services provided by assistant surgeons, 6    hospitalists, and intensivists;7        (3) diagnostic services, including radiology and 8    laboratory services, except for advanced diagnostic 9    laboratory tests identified on the most current list 10    published by the United States Secretary of Health and 11    Human Services under 42 U.S.C. 300gg-132(b)(3);12        (4) items and services provided by other specialty 13    practitioners as the United States Secretary of Health and 14    Human Services specifies through rulemaking under 42 15    U.S.C. 300gg-132(b)(3);16        (5) items and services provided by a nonparticipating 17    provider if there is no participating provider who can 18    furnish the item or service at the facility; and19        (6) items and services provided by a nonparticipating 20    provider if there is no participating provider who will 21    furnish the item or service because a participating 22    provider has asserted the participating provider's rights 23    under the Health Care Right of Conscience Act. 24    "Average gross charge rate" means, with respect to 25nonparticipating ground ambulance service providers, the 26average of the provider's gross charge rates in place for each   SB3288- 24 -LRB104 16103 BAB 29407 b1individual charge described in subsection (b-15) of this 2Section for dates of service that fall within the 12-month 3period ending on June 30 immediately preceding the date on 4which the reporting of average gross charge rates is required. 5    "Cost sharing" means the amount an insured, beneficiary, 6or enrollee is responsible for paying for a covered item or 7service under the terms of the policy or certificate. "Cost 8sharing" includes copayments, coinsurance, and amounts paid 9toward deductibles, but does not include amounts paid towards 10premiums, balance billing by out-of-network providers, or the 11cost of items or services that are not covered under the policy 12or certificate.13    "Emergency department of a hospital" means any hospital 14department that provides emergency services, including a 15hospital outpatient department.16    "Emergency medical condition" has the meaning ascribed to 17that term in Section 10 of the Managed Care Reform and Patient 18Rights Act.19    "Emergency medical screening examination" has the meaning 20ascribed to that term in Section 10 of the Managed Care Reform 21and Patient Rights Act.22    "Emergency services" means, with respect to an emergency 23medical condition:24        (1) in general, an emergency medical screening 25    examination, including ancillary services routinely 26    available to the emergency department to evaluate such   SB3288- 25 -LRB104 16103 BAB 29407 b1    emergency medical condition, and such further medical 2    examination and treatment as would be required to 3    stabilize the patient regardless of the department of the 4    hospital or other facility in which such further 5    examination or treatment is furnished; or6        (2) additional items and services for which benefits 7    are provided or covered under the coverage and that are 8    furnished by a nonparticipating provider or 9    nonparticipating emergency facility regardless of the 10    department of the hospital or other facility in which such 11    items are furnished after the insured, beneficiary, or 12    enrollee is stabilized and as part of outpatient 13    observation or an inpatient or outpatient stay with 14    respect to the visit in which the services described in 15    paragraph (1) are furnished. Services after stabilization 16    cease to be emergency services only when all the 17    conditions of 42 U.S.C. 300gg-111(a)(3)(C)(ii)(II) and 18    regulations thereunder are met.19    "Emergency ground ambulance service" means ground 20ambulance service provided by ground ambulance service 21providers, regardless of whether the patient was transported, 22if the service was provided pursuant to a request to 9-1-1 or 23an equivalent telephone number, texting system, or other 24method of summoning emergency service or if the service 25provided was provided when a patient's condition, at the time 26of service, was considered to be an emergency medical   SB3288- 26 -LRB104 16103 BAB 29407 b1condition as determined by a physician licensed under the 2Medical Practice Act of 1987. 3    "Evaluation" means, with respect to emergency ground 4ambulance service, the provision of a medical screening 5examination to determine whether an emergency medical 6condition exists. 7    "Freestanding Emergency Center" means a facility licensed 8under Section 32.5 of the Emergency Medical Services (EMS) 9Systems Act.10    "Ground ambulance service" means both medical 11transportation service that is described as ground ambulance 12service by the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services and 13medical nontransportation service, such as evaluation without 14transport, treatment without transport, or paramedic 15intercept, and that is, in either case, provided in a vehicle 16that is licensed as an ambulance under the Emergency Medical 17Services (EMS) Systems Act or by EMS Personnel assigned to a 18vehicle that is licensed as an ambulance under the Emergency 19Medical Services (EMS) Systems Act. "Ground ambulance service" 20may include any combination of the following: emergency ground 21ambulance service in a ground ambulance, urgent ground 22ambulance service, evaluation without treatment, treatment 23without transport, and paramedic intercept.24    "Ground ambulance service provider" means a vehicle 25service provider under the Emergency Medical Services (EMS) 26Systems Act that operates licensed ground ambulances for the   SB3288- 27 -LRB104 16103 BAB 29407 b1purpose of providing emergency ground ambulance services, 2urgent ground ambulances services, or both. "Ground ambulance 3service provider" includes both ambulance providers and 4ambulance suppliers as described by the Centers for Medicare 5and Medicaid Services. 6    "Health care facility" means, in the context of 7non-emergency services, any of the following:8        (1) a hospital as defined in 42 U.S.C. 1395x(e);9        (2) a hospital outpatient department;10        (3) a critical access hospital certified under 42 11    U.S.C. 1395i-4(e);12        (4) an ambulatory surgical treatment center as defined 13    in the Ambulatory Surgical Treatment Center Act; or14        (5) any recipient of a license under the Hospital 15    Licensing Act that is not otherwise described in this 16    definition.17    "Health care provider" means a provider as defined in 18subsection (d) of Section 370g. "Health care provider" does 19not include a provider of air ambulance or ground ambulance 20services.21    "Health care services" has the meaning ascribed to that 22term in subsection (a) of Section 370g.23    "Health insurance issuer" has the meaning ascribed to that 24term in Section 5 of the Illinois Health Insurance Portability 25and Accountability Act.26    "Nonparticipating emergency facility" means, with respect   SB3288- 28 -LRB104 16103 BAB 29407 b1to the furnishing of an item or service under a policy of group 2or individual health insurance coverage, any of the following 3facilities that does not have a contractual relationship 4directly or indirectly with a health insurance issuer in 5relation to the coverage:6        (1) an emergency department of a hospital;7        (2) a Freestanding Emergency Center;8        (3) an ambulatory surgical treatment center as defined 9    in the Ambulatory Surgical Treatment Center Act; or10        (4) with respect to emergency services described in 11    paragraph (2) of the definition of "emergency services", a 12    hospital.13    "Nonparticipating ground ambulance service provider" 14means, with respect to the furnishing of an item or services 15under a policy of group or individual health insurance 16coverage, any ground ambulance service provider that does not 17have a contractual relationship directly or indirectly with a 18health insurance issuer in relation to the coverage. 19    "Nonparticipating provider" means, with respect to the 20furnishing of an item or service under a policy of group or 21individual health insurance coverage, any health care provider 22who does not have a contractual relationship directly or 23indirectly with a health insurance issuer in relation to the 24coverage.25    "Paramedic intercept" means a service in which a ground 26ambulance staffed by licensed paramedics rendezvouses with a   SB3288- 29 -LRB104 16103 BAB 29407 b1ground ambulance staffed with nonparamedics to provide 2advanced life support care. As used in this definition, 3"advanced life support care" means life support care that is 4warranted when a patient's condition and need for treatment 5exceed the basic life support or intermediate life support 6level of care. 7    "Participating emergency facility" means any of the 8following facilities that has a contractual relationship 9directly or indirectly with a health insurance issuer offering 10group or individual health insurance coverage setting forth 11the terms and conditions on which a relevant health care 12service is provided to an insured, beneficiary, or enrollee 13under the coverage:14        (1) an emergency department of a hospital;15        (2) a Freestanding Emergency Center;16        (3) an ambulatory surgical treatment center as defined 17    in the Ambulatory Surgical Treatment Center Act; or18        (4) with respect to emergency services described in 19    paragraph (2) of the definition of "emergency services", a 20    hospital.21    For purposes of this definition, a single case agreement 22between an emergency facility and an issuer that is used to 23address unique situations in which an insured, beneficiary, or 24enrollee requires services that typically occur out-of-network 25constitutes a contractual relationship and is limited to the 26parties to the agreement.  SB3288- 30 -LRB104 16103 BAB 29407 b1    "Participating ground ambulance service provider" means 2any ground ambulance service provider that has a contractual 3relationship directly or indirectly with a health insurance 4issuer offering group or individual health insurance coverage 5setting forth the terms and conditions on which a relevant 6health care service is provided to an insured, beneficiary, or 7enrollee under the coverage. As used in this definition, a 8single case agreement between a ground ambulance service 9provider and a health insurance issuer that is used to address 10unique situations in which an insured, beneficiary, or 11enrollee requires services that typically occur out-of-network 12constitutes a contractual relationship and is limited to the 13parties of the agreement. 14    "Participating health care facility" means any health care 15facility that has a contractual relationship directly or 16indirectly with a health insurance issuer offering group or 17individual health insurance coverage setting forth the terms 18and conditions on which a relevant health care service is 19provided to an insured, beneficiary, or enrollee under the 20coverage. A single case agreement between an emergency 21facility and an issuer that is used to address unique 22situations in which an insured, beneficiary, or enrollee 23requires services that typically occur out-of-network 24constitutes a contractual relationship for purposes of this 25definition and is limited to the parties to the agreement.26    "Participating provider" means any health care provider   SB3288- 31 -LRB104 16103 BAB 29407 b1that has a contractual relationship directly or indirectly 2with a health insurance issuer offering group or individual 3health insurance coverage setting forth the terms and 4conditions on which a relevant health care service is provided 5to an insured, beneficiary, or enrollee under the coverage.6    "Qualifying payment amount" has the meaning given to that 7term in 42 U.S.C. 300gg-111(a)(3)(E) and the regulations 8promulgated thereunder.9    "Recognized amount" means, except as otherwise provided in 10this Section, the lesser of the amount initially billed by the 11provider or the qualifying payment amount.12    "Stabilize" means "stabilization" as defined in Section 10 13of the Managed Care Reform and Patient Rights Act.14    "Treating provider" means a health care provider who has 15evaluated the individual.16    "Treatment" means, with respect to the provision of 17emergency ground ambulance service, the provision of an 18evaluation and either (i) a therapy or therapeutic agent used 19to treat an emergency medical condition or (ii) a procedure 20used to treat an emergency medical condition.21    "Urgent ground ambulance service" means ground ambulance 22service that is deemed medically necessary by a health care 23professional and is required within 12 hours after the 24certification of the need for the service. 25    "Visit" means, with respect to health care services 26furnished to an individual at a health care facility, health   SB3288- 32 -LRB104 16103 BAB 29407 b1care services furnished by a provider at the facility, as well 2as equipment, devices, telehealth services, imaging services, 3laboratory services, and preoperative and postoperative 4services regardless of whether the provider furnishing such 5services is at the facility. 6    (b) Emergency services. When a beneficiary, insured, or 7enrollee receives emergency services from a nonparticipating 8provider or a nonparticipating emergency facility, the health 9insurance issuer shall ensure that the beneficiary, insured, 10or enrollee shall incur no greater out-of-pocket costs than 11the beneficiary, insured, or enrollee would have incurred with 12a participating provider or a participating emergency 13facility. Any cost-sharing requirements shall be applied as 14though the emergency services had been received from a 15participating provider or a participating facility. Cost 16sharing shall be calculated based on the recognized amount for 17the emergency services. If the cost sharing for the same item 18or service furnished by a participating provider would have 19been a flat-dollar copayment, that amount shall be the 20cost-sharing amount unless the provider has billed a lesser 21total amount. In no event shall the beneficiary, insured, 22enrollee, or any group policyholder or plan sponsor be liable 23to or billed by the health insurance issuer, the 24nonparticipating provider, or the nonparticipating emergency 25facility for any amount beyond the cost sharing calculated in 26accordance with this subsection with respect to the emergency   SB3288- 33 -LRB104 16103 BAB 29407 b1services delivered. Administrative requirements or limitations 2shall be no greater than those applicable to emergency 3services received from a participating provider or a 4participating emergency facility. 5    (b-5) Non-emergency services at participating health care 6facilities. 7        (1) When a beneficiary, insured, or enrollee utilizes 8    a participating health care facility and, due to any 9    reason, covered ancillary services are provided by a 10    nonparticipating provider during or resulting from the 11    visit, the health insurance issuer shall ensure that the 12    beneficiary, insured, or enrollee shall incur no greater 13    out-of-pocket costs than the beneficiary, insured, or 14    enrollee would have incurred with a participating provider 15    for the ancillary services. Any cost-sharing requirements 16    shall be applied as though the ancillary services had been 17    received from a participating provider. Cost sharing shall 18    be calculated based on the recognized amount for the 19    ancillary services. If the cost sharing for the same item 20    or service furnished by a participating provider would 21    have been a flat-dollar copayment, that amount shall be 22    the cost-sharing amount unless the provider has billed a 23    lesser total amount. In no event shall the beneficiary, 24    insured, enrollee, or any group policyholder or plan 25    sponsor be liable to or billed by the health insurance 26    issuer, the nonparticipating provider, or the   SB3288- 34 -LRB104 16103 BAB 29407 b1    participating health care facility for any amount beyond 2    the cost sharing calculated in accordance with this 3    subsection with respect to the ancillary services 4    delivered. In addition to ancillary services, the 5    requirements of this paragraph shall also apply with 6    respect to covered items or services furnished as a result 7    of unforeseen, urgent medical needs that arise at the time 8    an item or service is furnished, regardless of whether the 9    nonparticipating provider satisfied the notice and consent 10    criteria under paragraph (2) of this subsection. 11        (2) When a beneficiary, insured, or enrollee utilizes 12    a participating health care facility and receives 13    non-emergency covered health care services other than 14    those described in paragraph (1) of this subsection from a 15    nonparticipating provider during or resulting from the 16    visit, the health insurance issuer shall ensure that the 17    beneficiary, insured, or enrollee incurs no greater 18    out-of-pocket costs than the beneficiary, insured, or 19    enrollee would have incurred with a participating provider 20    unless the nonparticipating provider or the participating 21    health care facility on behalf of the nonparticipating 22    provider satisfies the notice and consent criteria 23    provided in 42 U.S.C. 300gg-132 and regulations 24    promulgated thereunder. If the notice and consent criteria 25    are not satisfied, then:26            (A) any cost-sharing requirements shall be applied   SB3288- 35 -LRB104 16103 BAB 29407 b1        as though the health care services had been received 2        from a participating provider;3            (B) cost sharing shall be calculated based on the 4        recognized amount for the health care services; and5            (C) in no event shall the beneficiary, insured, 6        enrollee, or any group policyholder or plan sponsor be 7        liable to or billed by the health insurance issuer, 8        the nonparticipating provider, or the participating 9        health care facility for any amount beyond the cost 10        sharing calculated in accordance with this subsection 11        with respect to the health care services delivered. 12    (b-10) Coverage for ground ambulance services provided by 13nonparticipating ground ambulance service providers.14        (1) Any group or individual policy of accident and 15    health insurance amended, delivered, issued, or renewed on 16    or after January 1, 2027 shall provide coverage for both 17    emergency ground ambulance service and urgent ground 18    ambulance service. 19        (2) Beginning on January 1, 2027, when a beneficiary, 20    insured, or enrollee receives emergency ground ambulance 21    services or urgent ambulance services from a 22    nonparticipating ground ambulance service provider, the 23    health insurance issuer shall ensure that the beneficiary, 24    insured, or enrollee shall incur no greater out-of-pocket 25    costs than the beneficiary, insured, or enrollee would 26    have incurred with a participating ground ambulance   SB3288- 36 -LRB104 16103 BAB 29407 b1    provider. Any cost-sharing requirements shall be applied 2    as though the emergency ground ambulance services or 3    urgent ground ambulance services had been received from a 4    participating ground ambulance service provider. Except as 5    otherwise provided in State or federal law, cost sharing 6    shall be calculated based on the lesser of the policy's 7    copayment or coinsurance for an emergency room visit or 8    10% of the recognized amount. For purposes of this 9    subsection, the recognized amount shall be calculated as 10    provided for in paragraph (3) of this subsection. Except 11    as otherwise provided for in State or federal law, if the 12    cost sharing for the same item or service furnished by a 13    participating ground ambulance provider would have been a 14    flat-dollar copayment, that amount shall be the 15    cost-sharing amount unless the nonparticipating ground 16    ambulance provider has billed a lesser total amount. 17        (3) Upon reasonable demand by a nonparticipating 18    ground ambulance service provider and after subtracting 19    the beneficiary's, insured's, or enrollee's cost sharing 20    amount, a health insurance issuer shall pay the 21    nonparticipating ground ambulance service provider as 22    follows: 23            (A) for nonparticipating ground ambulance service 24        providers subject to a unit of local government that 25        has jurisdiction over where the service was provided, 26        a rate that is equal to the rate established or   SB3288- 37 -LRB104 16103 BAB 29407 b1        approved by the governing body of the local government 2        providing ground ambulance service having jurisdiction 3        for that area or subarea; or4            (B) for nonparticipating ground ambulance service 5        providers that are not subject to the jurisdiction of 6        a unit of local government, a rate that is equal to the 7        lesser of (i) the negotiated rate between the 8        nonparticipating ground ambulance service provider and 9        the health insurance issuer; (ii) 85% of the 10        nonparticipating ground ambulance service provider's 11        billed charges; or (iii) the average gross charge rate 12        in effect for the date of service in question for a 13        base charge and, if applicable, a loaded mileage 14        charge, the nonparticipating ground ambulance service 15        provider has filed with the Department of Public 16        Health in accordance with subsection (b-15). 17            By accepting the payment from the health insurance 18        issuer, the nonparticipating ground ambulance service 19        provider shall not seek any payment from the 20        beneficiary, insured, or enrollee for any amount that 21        exceeds the deductible, coinsurance, or copay for 22        services provided to the beneficiary, insured, or 23        enrollee. 24    (b-15) Beginning on October 1, 2026, and each October 1 25thereafter, each nonparticipating ground ambulance service 26provider shall file annually with the Department of Public   SB3288- 38 -LRB104 16103 BAB 29407 b1Health, in the form and manner prescribed by the Department of 2Public Health, its average gross charge rates and any other 3information required by the Department of Public Health, by 4rule, for each of the following ground ambulance charge 5descriptions, as applicable: (1) basic life support, urgent 6base; (2) basic life support, emergency base; (3) advanced 7life support, urgent, level 1 base; (4) advanced life support, 8emergency, level 1 base; (5) advanced life support, emergency, 9level 2 base; (6) specialty care transport base; (7) emergency 10response, evaluation without transport base; (8) emergency 11response, treatment without transport base; (9) emergency 12response, paramedic intercept base; and (10) loaded mileage, 13per loaded mile charge for each of the applicable base charge 14descriptions services. The Department of Public Health shall 15publish the submitted rate information by January 1, 2027 and 16every January 1 thereafter. The Department of Public Health 17may request information from ground ambulance service 18providers and health insurance issuers regarding factors 19contributing to the network status of the ground ambulance 20service providers. The Department of Public Health may, upon 21the submission of rate information, assess a fee to each 22ground ambulance service provider that shall not exceed the 23administrative costs to complete the Department of Public 24Health's obligations in this subsection. The Department of 25Public Health may also request information from nationally 26recognized organizations that provide data on health care   SB3288- 39 -LRB104 16103 BAB 29407 b1costs. The Department of Insurance shall direct the health 2insurance issuer to the location in which the information 3reported to the Department of Public Health is stored. 4    (c) Notwithstanding any other provision of this Code, 5except when the notice and consent criteria are satisfied for 6the situation in paragraph (2) of subsection (b-5), any 7benefits a beneficiary, insured, or enrollee receives for 8services under the situations in subsection (b), (b-5), 9(b-10), or (b-15) are assigned to the nonparticipating 10providers, nonparticipating ground ambulance service provider, 11or the facility acting on their behalf. Upon receipt of the 12provider's bill or facility's bill, the health insurance 13issuer shall provide the nonparticipating provider, 14nonparticipating ground ambulance service provider, or the 15facility with a written explanation of benefits that specifies 16the proposed reimbursement and the applicable deductible, 17copayment, or coinsurance amounts owed by the insured, 18beneficiary, or enrollee. The health insurance issuer shall 19pay any reimbursement subject to this Section directly to the 20nonparticipating provider, nonparticipating ground ambulance 21service provider, or the facility.22    (d) For bills assigned under subsection (c), the 23nonparticipating provider or the facility may bill the health 24insurance issuer for the services rendered, and the health 25insurance issuer may pay the billed amount or attempt to 26negotiate reimbursement with the nonparticipating provider or   SB3288- 40 -LRB104 16103 BAB 29407 b1the facility. Within 30 calendar days after the provider or 2facility transmits the bill to the health insurance issuer, 3the issuer shall send an initial payment or notice of denial of 4payment with the written explanation of benefits to the 5provider or facility. If attempts to negotiate reimbursement 6for services provided by a nonparticipating provider do not 7result in a resolution of the payment dispute within 30 days 8after receipt of written explanation of benefits by the health 9insurance issuer, then the health insurance issuer or 10nonparticipating provider or the facility may initiate binding 11arbitration to determine payment for services provided on a 12per-bill or batched-bill basis, in accordance with Section 13300gg-111 of the Public Health Service Act and the regulations 14promulgated thereunder. The party requesting arbitration shall 15notify the other party arbitration has been initiated and 16state its final offer before arbitration. In response to this 17notice, the nonrequesting party shall inform the requesting 18party of its final offer before the arbitration occurs. 19Arbitration shall be initiated by filing a request with the 20Department of Insurance.21    (e) The Department of Insurance shall publish a list of 22approved arbitrators or entities that shall provide binding 23arbitration. These arbitrators shall be American Arbitration 24Association or American Health Lawyers Association trained 25arbitrators. Both parties must agree on an arbitrator from the 26Department of Insurance's or its approved entity's list of   SB3288- 41 -LRB104 16103 BAB 29407 b1arbitrators. If no agreement can be reached, then a list of 5 2arbitrators shall be provided by the Department of Insurance 3or the approved entity. From the list of 5 arbitrators, the 4health insurance issuer can veto 2 arbitrators and the 5provider or facility can veto 2 arbitrators. The remaining 6arbitrator shall be the chosen arbitrator. This arbitration 7shall consist of a review of the written submissions by both 8parties. The arbitrator shall not establish a rebuttable 9presumption that the qualifying payment amount should be the 10total amount owed to the provider or facility by the 11combination of the issuer and the insured, beneficiary, or 12enrollee. Binding arbitration shall provide for a written 13decision within 45 days after the request is filed with the 14Department of Insurance. Both parties shall be bound by the 15arbitrator's decision. The arbitrator's expenses and fees, 16together with other expenses, not including attorney's fees, 17incurred in the conduct of the arbitration, shall be paid as 18provided in the decision.19    (f) (Blank).20    (g) Section 368a of this Code Act shall not apply during 21the pendency of a decision under subsection (d). Upon the 22issuance of the arbitrator's decision, Section 368a applies 23with respect to the amount, if any, by which the arbitrator's 24determination exceeds the issuer's initial payment under 25subsection (c), or the entire amount of the arbitrator's 26determination if initial payment was denied. Any interest   SB3288- 42 -LRB104 16103 BAB 29407 b1required to be paid to a provider under Section 368a shall not 2accrue until after 30 days of an arbitrator's decision as 3provided in subsection (d), but in no circumstances longer 4than 150 days from the date the nonparticipating 5facility-based provider billed for services rendered.6    (h) Nothing in this Section shall be interpreted to change 7the prudent layperson provisions with respect to emergency 8services under the Managed Care Reform and Patient Rights Act. 9    (i) Nothing in this Section shall preclude a health care 10provider from billing a beneficiary, insured, or enrollee for 11reasonable administrative fees, such as service fees for 12checks returned for nonsufficient funds and missed 13appointments.14    (j) Nothing in this Section shall preclude a beneficiary, 15insured, or enrollee from assigning benefits to a 16nonparticipating provider when the notice and consent criteria 17are satisfied under paragraph (2) of subsection (b-5) or in 18any other situation not described in subsection (b) or (b-5).19    (k) Except when the notice and consent criteria are 20satisfied under paragraph (2) of subsection (b-5), if an 21individual receives health care services under the situations 22described in subsection (b) or (b-5), no referral requirement 23or any other provision contained in the policy or certificate 24of coverage shall deny coverage, reduce benefits, or otherwise 25defeat the requirements of this Section for services that 26would have been covered with a participating provider.   SB3288- 43 -LRB104 16103 BAB 29407 b1However, this subsection shall not be construed to preclude a 2provider contract with a health insurance issuer, or with an 3administrator or similar entity acting on the issuer's behalf, 4from imposing requirements on the participating provider, 5participating emergency facility, or participating health care 6facility relating to the referral of covered individuals to 7nonparticipating providers.8    (l) Except if the notice and consent criteria are 9satisfied under paragraph (2) of subsection (b-5), 10cost-sharing amounts calculated in conformity with this 11Section shall count toward any deductible or out-of-pocket 12maximum applicable to in-network coverage.13    (m) The Department has the authority to enforce the 14requirements of this Section in the situations described in 15subsections (b) and (b-5), and in any other situation for 16which 42 U.S.C. Chapter 6A, Subchapter XXV, Parts D or E and 17regulations promulgated thereunder would prohibit an 18individual from being billed or liable for emergency services 19furnished by a nonparticipating provider or nonparticipating 20emergency facility or for non-emergency health care services 21furnished by a nonparticipating provider at a participating 22health care facility.23    (n) This Section does not apply with respect to air 24ambulance services. This Section does not apply to any policy 25of excepted benefits or to short-term, limited-duration health 26insurance coverage.   SB3288- 44 -LRB104 16103 BAB 29407 b1    (o) A home rule unit may not regulate payments for ground 2ambulance service in a manner inconsistent with this Section. 3This subsection is a limitation under subsection (i) of 4Section 6 of Article VII of the Illinois Constitution on the 5concurrent exercise by home rule units of powers and functions 6exercised by the State. 7    (p) (o) Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the 8contrary, if a beneficiary, insured, or enrollee receives 9neonatal intensive care from a nonparticipating provider or 10nonparticipating facility, a health insurance issuer shall 11ensure that the beneficiary, insured, or enrollee shall incur 12no greater out-of-pocket costs than he or she would have 13incurred with a participating provider or a participating 14facility, as long as the nonparticipating provider or 15nonparticipating facility bills the neonatal intensive care as 16emergency services. 17(Source: P.A. 103-440, eff. 1-1-24; 104-60, eff. 1-1-26; 18104-248, eff. 8-15-25; revised 9-12-25.) 19    Section 95. No acceleration or delay. Where this Act makes 20changes in a statute that is represented in this Act by text 21that is not yet or no longer in effect (for example, a Section 22represented by multiple versions), the use of that text does 23not accelerate or delay the taking effect of (i) the changes 24made by this Act or (ii) provisions derived from any other 25Public Act.